Washington statutes.
RCW 15.83.110

Advisory committee.

The director shall establish an advisory committee consisting of the following persons: Six producers who are producers from names submitted by an association of producers, and six handlers subject to this chapter from names submitted by handlers. The advisory committee shall study and report on all issues related to this chapter.

[ 1989 c 355 s 12.]